Idaho, session 2026, S1282.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 37, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 31, Title 37, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 31
Kratom Consumer Protection and Safety
37-3101. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Idaho Kratom Consumer Protection and Safety Act."
37-3102. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature finds
that:
(a) Kratom is legally sold in Idaho and used by adults for a variety of
personal purposes;
(b) Public health risks arise primarily from adulterated or chemically
enhanced kratom products, particularly those containing artificially
elevated levels of 7-hydroxymitragynine (7-OH); and
(c) Kratom's natural alkaloid profile contains only trace amounts of
7-OH, while potentially dangerous products often include synthetic or
spiked levels of 7-OH.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To preserve adult access to natural kratom while preventing the
sale of unsafe, adulterated, or synthetic products;
(b) That regulation of natural kratom products be limited, minimal, and
fiscally neutral, and not include the imposition of licensing fees nor
registration requirements; and
(c) To occupy the whole field of regulation regarding natural kratom
products such that no political subdivision of the state shall adopt
or enact any standard or other requirement that is inconsistent with,
varies from, exceeds, or imposes additional burdens than the provisions
of this chapter. Any such standard or requirement that now exists, or
that may hereinafter exist, is hereby declared to be unenforceable.
37-3103. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adulterated kratom product" means a kratom product that:
(a) Contains any synthesized material, semisynthetic alkaloid, or syn-
thetic kratom-like compound;


(b) Contains added or artificially increased 7-hydroxymitragynine
(7-OH);
(c) Contains 7-OH that exceeds two percent (2%) of its total alkaloid
content;
(d) Contains more than one (1) milligram per serving of 7-OH;
(e) Contains heavy metals exceeding applicable federal limits;
(f) Contains microbial contamination, mold, salmonella, E. coli, or
other harmful adulterants; or
(g) Contains any controlled substance listed under chapter 27, title
37, Idaho Code.
(2) "Alkaloid" means a compound found in the mitragyna speciosa leaf,
including but not limited to mitragynine, paynantheine, speciociliatine, or
speciogynine.
(3) "Department" means the Idaho department of agriculture.
(4) "Kratom" means the mitragyna speciosa plant or any part of that
plant.
(5) "Kratom distributor" means a person that sells, transports,
stores, or wholesales a finished kratom product that the person did not manu-
facture, process, extract, alter, repackage, or relabel.
(6) "Kratom extract" means a substance or compound obtained by extrac-
tion from the mitragyna speciosa leaf that contains kratom alkaloids and
that does not contain any controlled substances or levels of residual sol-
vents higher than is allowed in the U.S. pharmacopoeia (USP) 467.
(7) "Kratom product" means a finished product containing kratom or
kratom extract that is intended for human consumption that contains any part
of the mitragyna speciosa plant in any form.
(8) "Kratom processor" means a person that:
(a) Manufactures, distributes, or warehouses a kratom product; or
(b) Advertises, represents, or holds itself out as manufacturing, dis-
tributing, or warehousing a kratom product.
(9) "Kratom retailer" means a person that sells or advertises itself as
selling kratom products directly to consumers for human consumption.
(10) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, associ-
ation, governmental subdivision or agency, or public or private organiza-
tion or entity of any character.
37-3104. PROHIBITED CONDUCT. (1) A kratom processor or retailer shall
not:
(a) Sell, prepare, or distribute an adulterated kratom product;
(b) Add, introduce, or apply any substance intended to increase the
concentration or potency of 7-OH in a kratom product;
(c) Sell a synthetic product falsely represented as a kratom product;
and
(d) Mislabel or intentionally misrepresent the alkaloid content of a
kratom product.
(2) A kratom retailer does not violate this chapter if it is shown by a
preponderance of the evidence that the retailer, in good faith, relied on the
representation of a kratom processor that the product was a kratom product
and not an adulterated kratom product.


(3) This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit the production or
sale of kratom products that include other substances, such as vitamins,
minerals, botanicals, concentrates, metabolites, extracts, or combinations
thereof, that are not otherwise prohibited by law.
37-3105. AGE RESTRICTION. No person shall sell, deliver, or give away
kratom or cause or permit kratom to be sold, delivered, or given away to any
person under eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) Proof of age shall be a validly issued state, district, territo-
rial, possession, provincial, national, or other equivalent government
driver's license, identification card, or military identification card
bearing a photograph and date of birth, or a valid passport.
(3) Any person who knowingly misrepresents age for the purpose of ob-
taining kratom shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4)(a) An affirmative defense shall be available for a kratom retailer
that requested, examined, and reasonably relied on identification es-
tablishing age pursuant to this section provided to the retailer by a
person intending to purchase a kratom product.
(b) A kratom retailer's failure to request and examine identification
from a person intending to purchase a kratom product prior to the sale
of such product to such person shall be construed against the retailer
and shall form a conclusive basis for the retailer's violation of this
section.
37-3106. TESTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) A kratom processor shall keep, and
make available upon request by the department, a certification that the pro-
cessor's operations are consistent with applicable federal regulations and
guidelines, including:
(a) 21 CFR 111 and 117;
(b) Requirements related to the processor establishing limits and con-
trols for contaminants reasonably likely to occur; and
(c) Other such requirements that apply to kratom products made avail-
able pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for facilities that man-
ufacture, process, pack, or store a kratom product that is being offered
for sale in the state of Idaho.
(2) A kratom retailer or distributor may rely, in good faith, on the
kratom processor's certification and shall not be subject to penalty for
violations resulting solely from inaccurate or fraudulent information pro-
vided by a kratom processor.
37-3107. LABELING REQUIREMENTS. A kratom product offered for sale in
Idaho shall include on its package:
(1) The name and business address of the processor or retailer;
(2) A batch number; and
(3) A statement that the product:
(a) Contains kratom;
(b) Has not been evaluated by the U.S. food and drug administration, and
is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease; and
(c) Is not for sale to persons under eighteen (18) years of age.


37-3108. ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES. (1) A person that knowingly vio-
lates this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed:
(a) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a first violation; and
(b) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each subsequent vio-
lation.
(2) Each batch or individually packaged product sold in violation con-
stitutes a separate offense.
(3) The attorney general or a county prosecuting attorney in which the
alleged violation occurred shall bring a civil action to enforce this chap-
ter.
(a) A political subdivision of the state may request the office of the
attorney general and the county prosecuting attorney to bring a civil
action to enforce this chapter.
(b) A private cause of action is prohibited.
(4) Any adulterated kratom product may be seized and destroyed pursuant
to court order.
37-3109. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The department may adopt only mini-
mal rules, subject to legislative approval, necessary to define acceptable
contaminant limits and testing standards. No rule may impose any licensing
requirement, registration requirement, fee, or regulatory burden not ex-
pressly authorized in this chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.